Illinois, session 104th, SB1690.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 1. The Illinois Administrative Procedure Act is 5amended by adding Section 5-45.65 as follows: 6    (5 ILCS 100/5-45.65 new)7    Sec. 5-45.65. Emergency rulemaking; wage increase for 8direct support personnel. To provide for the expeditious and 9timely implementation of subsection (h) of Section 74 of the 10Mental Health and Developmental Disabilities Administrative 11Act, emergency rules implementing the changes may be adopted 12in accordance with Section 5-45 by the Department of Human 13Services. The adoption of emergency rules authorized by 14Section 5-45 and this Section is deemed to be necessary for the 15public interest, safety, and welfare.16    This Section is repealed one year after the effective date 17of this amendatory Act of the 104th General Assembly. 18    Section 5. The Mental Health and Developmental 19Disabilities Administrative Act is amended by changing Section 2074 as follows: 21    (20 ILCS 1705/74)  SB1690- 2 -LRB104 10113 KTG 20185 b1    Sec. 74. Rates and reimbursements. 2    (a) Within 30 days after July 6, 2017 (the effective date 3of Public Act 100-23), the Department shall increase rates and 4reimbursements to fund a minimum of a $0.75 per hour wage 5increase for front-line personnel, including, but not limited 6to, direct support professionals, aides, front-line 7supervisors, qualified intellectual disabilities 8professionals, nurses, and non-administrative support staff 9working in community-based provider organizations serving 10individuals with developmental disabilities. The Department 11shall adopt rules, including emergency rules under subsection 12(y) of Section 5-45 of the Illinois Administrative Procedure 13Act, to implement the provisions of this Section.14    (b) Rates and reimbursements. Within 30 days after June 4, 152018 (the effective date of Public Act 100-587), the 16Department shall increase rates and reimbursements to fund a 17minimum of a $0.50 per hour wage increase for front-line 18personnel, including, but not limited to, direct support 19professionals, aides, front-line supervisors, qualified 20intellectual disabilities professionals, nurses, and 21non-administrative support staff working in community-based 22provider organizations serving individuals with developmental 23disabilities. The Department shall adopt rules, including 24emergency rules under subsection (bb) of Section 5-45 of the 25Illinois Administrative Procedure Act, to implement the 26provisions of this Section.  SB1690- 3 -LRB104 10113 KTG 20185 b1    (c) Rates and reimbursements. Within 30 days after June 5, 22019 (the effective date of Public Act 101-10), subject to 3federal approval, the Department shall increase rates and 4reimbursements in effect on June 30, 2019 for community-based 5providers for persons with Developmental Disabilities by 3.5% 6The Department shall adopt rules, including emergency rules 7under subsection (jj) of Section 5-45 of the Illinois 8Administrative Procedure Act, to implement the provisions of 9this Section, including wage increases for direct care staff.10    (d) For community-based providers serving persons with 11intellectual/developmental disabilities, subject to federal 12approval of any relevant Waiver Amendment, the rates taking 13effect for services delivered on or after January 1, 2022, 14shall include an increase in the rate methodology sufficient 15to provide a $1.50 per hour wage increase for direct support 16professionals in residential settings and sufficient to 17provide wages for all residential non-executive direct care 18staff, excluding direct support professionals, at the federal 19Department of Labor, Bureau of Labor Statistics' average wage 20as defined in rule by the Department.21    The establishment of and any changes to the rate 22methodologies for community-based services provided to persons 23with intellectual/developmental disabilities are subject to 24federal approval of any relevant Waiver Amendment and shall be 25defined in rule by the Department. The Department shall adopt 26rules, including emergency rules as authorized by Section 5-45   SB1690- 4 -LRB104 10113 KTG 20185 b1of the Illinois Administrative Procedure Act, to implement the 2provisions of this subsection (d). 3    (e) For community-based providers serving persons with 4intellectual/developmental disabilities, subject to federal 5approval of any relevant Waiver Amendment, the rates taking 6effect for services delivered on or after January 1, 2023, 7shall include an increase in the rate methodology sufficient 8to provide a $1.00 per hour wage increase for all direct 9support professionals and all other frontline personnel who 10are not subject to the Bureau of Labor Statistics' average 11wage increases, who work in residential and community day 12services settings, with at least $0.50 of those funds to be 13provided as a direct increase to base wages, with the 14remaining $0.50 to be used flexibly for base wage increases. 15In addition, the rates taking effect for services delivered on 16or after January 1, 2023 shall include an increase sufficient 17to provide wages for all residential non-executive direct care 18staff, excluding direct support professionals, at the federal 19Department of Labor, Bureau of Labor Statistics' average wage 20as defined in rule by the Department.21    The establishment of and any changes to the rate 22methodologies for community-based services provided to persons 23with intellectual/developmental disabilities are subject to 24federal approval of any relevant Waiver Amendment and shall be 25defined in rule by the Department. The Department shall adopt 26rules, including emergency rules as authorized by Section 5-45   SB1690- 5 -LRB104 10113 KTG 20185 b1of the Illinois Administrative Procedure Act, to implement the 2provisions of this subsection. 3    (f) For community-based providers serving persons with 4intellectual/developmental disabilities, subject to federal 5approval of any relevant Waiver Amendment, the rates taking 6effect for services delivered on or after January 1, 2024 7shall include an increase in the rate methodology sufficient 8to provide a $2.50 per hour wage increase for all direct 9support professionals and all other frontline personnel who 10are not subject to the Bureau of Labor Statistics' average 11wage increases and who work in residential and community day 12services settings. At least $1.25 of the per hour wage 13increase shall be provided as a direct increase to base wages, 14and the remaining $1.25 of the per hour wage increase shall be 15used flexibly for base wage increases. In addition, the rates 16taking effect for services delivered on or after January 1, 172024 shall include an increase sufficient to provide wages for 18all residential non-executive direct care staff, excluding 19direct support professionals, at the federal Department of 20Labor, Bureau of Labor Statistics' average wage as defined in 21rule by the Department. 22    The establishment of and any changes to the rate 23methodologies for community-based services provided to persons 24with intellectual/developmental disabilities are subject to 25federal approval of any relevant Waiver Amendment and shall be 26defined in rule by the Department. The Department shall adopt   SB1690- 6 -LRB104 10113 KTG 20185 b1rules, including emergency rules as authorized by Section 5-45 2of the Illinois Administrative Procedure Act, to implement the 3provisions of this subsection. 4    (g) For community-based providers serving persons with 5intellectual or developmental disabilities, subject to federal 6approval of any relevant Waiver Amendment, the rates taking 7effect for services delivered on or after January 1, 2025 8shall include an increase in the rate methodology sufficient 9to provide a $1 per hour wage rate increase for all direct 10support personnel and all other frontline personnel who are 11not subject to the Bureau of Labor Statistics' average wage 12increases and who work in residential and community day 13services settings, with at least $0.75 of those funds to be 14provided as a direct increase to base wages and the remaining 15$0.25 to be used flexibly for base wage increases. These 16increases shall not be used by community-based providers for 17operational or administrative expenses. In addition, the rates 18taking effect for services delivered on or after January 1, 192025 shall include an increase sufficient to provide wages for 20all residential non-executive direct care staff, excluding 21direct support personnel, at the federal Department of Labor, 22Bureau of Labor Statistics' average wage as defined by rule by 23the Department. For services delivered on or after January 1, 242025, the rates shall include adjustments to 25employment-related expenses as defined by rule by the 26Department.   SB1690- 7 -LRB104 10113 KTG 20185 b1    The establishment of and any changes to the rate 2methodologies for community-based services provided to persons 3with intellectual or developmental disabilities are subject to 4federal approval of any relevant Waiver Amendment and shall be 5defined in rule by the Department. The Department shall adopt 6rules, including emergency rules as authorized by Section 5-45 7of the Illinois Administrative Procedure Act, to implement the 8provisions of this subsection. 9    (h) For community-based providers serving persons with 10intellectual or developmental disabilities, by no later than 11January 1, 2026, the Department of Healthcare and Family 12Services, in collaboration with the Department of Human 13Services, shall file an amendment to the Home and 14Community-Based Services Waiver Program for Adults with 15Developmental Disabilities authorized under Section 1915(c) of 16the Social Security Act that shall include an increase in the 17rate methodology sufficient to provide for a wage rate of 150% 18of the statewide, regional, or local minimum wage for services 19delivered on or after January 1, 2026, for all direct support 20personnel and all other frontline personnel who are not 21subject to the Bureau of Labor Statistics' average wage 22increases and who work in residential and community day 23services settings. The amendment shall also include an 24increase in the rate methodology sufficient to provide wage 25increases for all residential non-executive direct care staff, 26excluding direct support personnel, at the federal Department   SB1690- 8 -LRB104 10113 KTG 20185 b1of Labor, Bureau of Labor Statistics' average wage as defined 2by rule by the Department of Human Services for services 3delivered on or after January 1, 2026. For services delivered 4on or after January 1, 2026, the rates shall include 5adjustments to employment-related expenses as defined by rule 6by the Department of Human Services. The Department of Human 7Services shall adopt rules, including emergency rules as 8authorized by Section 5-45 of the Illinois Administrative 9Procedure Act, to implement the provisions of this subsection.10(Source: P.A. 102-16, eff. 6-17-21; 102-699, eff. 4-19-22; 11102-830, eff. 1-1-23; 103-8, eff. 6-7-23; 103-154, eff. 126-30-23; 103-588, eff. 6-5-24.) 13    Section 10. The Illinois Public Aid Code is amended by 14changing Section 5-5.4 as follows: 15    (305 ILCS 5/5-5.4)  (from Ch. 23, par. 5-5.4)16    Sec. 5-5.4. Standards of payment; Department of Healthcare 17and Family Services. The Department of Healthcare and Family 18Services shall develop standards of payment of nursing 19facility and ICF/DD services in facilities providing such 20services under this Article which: 21    (1) Provide for the determination of a facility's payment 22for nursing facility or ICF/DD services on a prospective 23basis. The amount of the payment rate for all nursing 24facilities certified by the Department of Public Health under   SB1690- 9 -LRB104 10113 KTG 20185 b1the ID/DD Community Care Act or the Nursing Home Care Act as 2Intermediate Care for the Developmentally Disabled facilities, 3Long Term Care for Under Age 22 facilities, Skilled Nursing 4facilities, or Intermediate Care facilities under the medical 5assistance program shall be prospectively established annually 6on the basis of historical, financial, and statistical data 7reflecting actual costs from prior years, which shall be 8applied to the current rate year and updated for inflation, 9except that the capital cost element for newly constructed 10facilities shall be based upon projected budgets. The annually 11established payment rate shall take effect on July 1 in 1984 12and subsequent years. No rate increase and no update for 13inflation shall be provided on or after July 1, 1994, unless 14specifically provided for in this Section. The changes made by 15Public Act 93-841 extending the duration of the prohibition 16against a rate increase or update for inflation are effective 17retroactive to July 1, 2004. 18    For facilities licensed by the Department of Public Health 19under the Nursing Home Care Act as Intermediate Care for the 20Developmentally Disabled facilities or Long Term Care for 21Under Age 22 facilities, the rates taking effect on July 1, 221998 shall include an increase of 3%. For facilities licensed 23by the Department of Public Health under the Nursing Home Care 24Act as Skilled Nursing facilities or Intermediate Care 25facilities, the rates taking effect on July 1, 1998 shall 26include an increase of 3% plus $1.10 per resident-day, as   SB1690- 10 -LRB104 10113 KTG 20185 b1defined by the Department. For facilities licensed by the 2Department of Public Health under the Nursing Home Care Act as 3Intermediate Care Facilities for the Developmentally Disabled 4or Long Term Care for Under Age 22 facilities, the rates taking 5effect on January 1, 2006 shall include an increase of 3%. For 6facilities licensed by the Department of Public Health under 7the Nursing Home Care Act as Intermediate Care Facilities for 8the Developmentally Disabled or Long Term Care for Under Age 922 facilities, the rates taking effect on January 1, 2009 10shall include an increase sufficient to provide a $0.50 per 11hour wage increase for non-executive staff. For facilities 12licensed by the Department of Public Health under the ID/DD 13Community Care Act as ID/DD Facilities the rates taking effect 14within 30 days after July 6, 2017 (the effective date of Public 15Act 100-23) shall include an increase sufficient to provide a 16$0.75 per hour wage increase for non-executive staff. The 17Department shall adopt rules, including emergency rules under 18subsection (y) of Section 5-45 of the Illinois Administrative 19Procedure Act, to implement the provisions of this paragraph. 20For facilities licensed by the Department of Public Health 21under the ID/DD Community Care Act as ID/DD Facilities and 22under the MC/DD Act as MC/DD Facilities, the rates taking 23effect within 30 days after June 5, 2019 (the effective date of 24Public Act 101-10) shall include an increase sufficient to 25provide a $0.50 per hour wage increase for non-executive 26front-line personnel, including, but not limited to, direct   SB1690- 11 -LRB104 10113 KTG 20185 b1support persons, aides, front-line supervisors, qualified 2intellectual disabilities professionals, nurses, and 3non-administrative support staff. The Department shall adopt 4rules, including emergency rules under subsection (bb) of 5Section 5-45 of the Illinois Administrative Procedure Act, to 6implement the provisions of this paragraph. 7    For facilities licensed by the Department of Public Health 8under the Nursing Home Care Act as Intermediate Care for the 9Developmentally Disabled facilities or Long Term Care for 10Under Age 22 facilities, the rates taking effect on July 1, 111999 shall include an increase of 1.6% plus $3.00 per 12resident-day, as defined by the Department. For facilities 13licensed by the Department of Public Health under the Nursing 14Home Care Act as Skilled Nursing facilities or Intermediate 15Care facilities, the rates taking effect on July 1, 1999 shall 16include an increase of 1.6% and, for services provided on or 17after October 1, 1999, shall be increased by $4.00 per 18resident-day, as defined by the Department. 19    For facilities licensed by the Department of Public Health 20under the Nursing Home Care Act as Intermediate Care for the 21Developmentally Disabled facilities or Long Term Care for 22Under Age 22 facilities, the rates taking effect on July 1, 232000 shall include an increase of 2.5% per resident-day, as 24defined by the Department. For facilities licensed by the 25Department of Public Health under the Nursing Home Care Act as 26Skilled Nursing facilities or Intermediate Care facilities,   SB1690- 12 -LRB104 10113 KTG 20185 b1the rates taking effect on July 1, 2000 shall include an 2increase of 2.5% per resident-day, as defined by the 3Department. 4    For facilities licensed by the Department of Public Health 5under the Nursing Home Care Act as skilled nursing facilities 6or intermediate care facilities, a new payment methodology 7must be implemented for the nursing component of the rate 8effective July 1, 2003. The Department of Public Aid (now 9Healthcare and Family Services) shall develop the new payment 10methodology using the Minimum Data Set (MDS) as the instrument 11to collect information concerning nursing home resident 12condition necessary to compute the rate. The Department shall 13develop the new payment methodology to meet the unique needs 14of Illinois nursing home residents while remaining subject to 15the appropriations provided by the General Assembly. A 16transition period from the payment methodology in effect on 17June 30, 2003 to the payment methodology in effect on July 1, 182003 shall be provided for a period not exceeding 3 years and 19184 days after implementation of the new payment methodology 20as follows: 21        (A) For a facility that would receive a lower nursing 22    component rate per patient day under the new system than 23    the facility received effective on the date immediately 24    preceding the date that the Department implements the new 25    payment methodology, the nursing component rate per 26    patient day for the facility shall be held at the level in   SB1690- 13 -LRB104 10113 KTG 20185 b1    effect on the date immediately preceding the date that the 2    Department implements the new payment methodology until a 3    higher nursing component rate of reimbursement is achieved 4    by that facility. 5        (B) For a facility that would receive a higher nursing 6    component rate per patient day under the payment 7    methodology in effect on July 1, 2003 than the facility 8    received effective on the date immediately preceding the 9    date that the Department implements the new payment 10    methodology, the nursing component rate per patient day 11    for the facility shall be adjusted. 12        (C) Notwithstanding paragraphs (A) and (B), the 13    nursing component rate per patient day for the facility 14    shall be adjusted subject to appropriations provided by 15    the General Assembly. 16    For facilities licensed by the Department of Public Health 17under the Nursing Home Care Act as Intermediate Care for the 18Developmentally Disabled facilities or Long Term Care for 19Under Age 22 facilities, the rates taking effect on March 1, 202001 shall include a statewide increase of 7.85%, as defined 21by the Department. 22    Notwithstanding any other provision of this Section, for 23facilities licensed by the Department of Public Health under 24the Nursing Home Care Act as skilled nursing facilities or 25intermediate care facilities, except facilities participating 26in the Department's demonstration program pursuant to the   SB1690- 14 -LRB104 10113 KTG 20185 b1provisions of Title 77, Part 300, Subpart T of the Illinois 2Administrative Code, the numerator of the ratio used by the 3Department of Healthcare and Family Services to compute the 4rate payable under this Section using the Minimum Data Set 5(MDS) methodology shall incorporate the following annual 6amounts as the additional funds appropriated to the Department 7specifically to pay for rates based on the MDS nursing 8component methodology in excess of the funding in effect on 9December 31, 2006:10        (i) For rates taking effect January 1, 2007, 11    $60,000,000.12        (ii) For rates taking effect January 1, 2008, 13    $110,000,000.14        (iii) For rates taking effect January 1, 2009, 15    $194,000,000. 16        (iv) For rates taking effect April 1, 2011, or the 17    first day of the month that begins at least 45 days after 18    February 16, 2011 (the effective date of Public Act 19    96-1530), $416,500,000 or an amount as may be necessary to 20    complete the transition to the MDS methodology for the 21    nursing component of the rate. Increased payments under 22    this item (iv) are not due and payable, however, until (i) 23    the methodologies described in this paragraph are approved 24    by the federal government in an appropriate State Plan 25    amendment and (ii) the assessment imposed by Section 5B-2 26    of this Code is determined to be a permissible tax under   SB1690- 15 -LRB104 10113 KTG 20185 b1    Title XIX of the Social Security Act.2    Notwithstanding any other provision of this Section, for 3facilities licensed by the Department of Public Health under 4the Nursing Home Care Act as skilled nursing facilities or 5intermediate care facilities, the support component of the 6rates taking effect on January 1, 2008 shall be computed using 7the most recent cost reports on file with the Department of 8Healthcare and Family Services no later than April 1, 2005, 9updated for inflation to January 1, 2006. 10    For facilities licensed by the Department of Public Health 11under the Nursing Home Care Act as Intermediate Care for the 12Developmentally Disabled facilities or Long Term Care for 13Under Age 22 facilities, the rates taking effect on April 1, 142002 shall include a statewide increase of 2.0%, as defined by 15the Department. This increase terminates on July 1, 2002; 16beginning July 1, 2002 these rates are reduced to the level of 17the rates in effect on March 31, 2002, as defined by the 18Department. 19    For facilities licensed by the Department of Public Health 20under the Nursing Home Care Act as skilled nursing facilities 21or intermediate care facilities, the rates taking effect on 22July 1, 2001 shall be computed using the most recent cost 23reports on file with the Department of Public Aid no later than 24April 1, 2000, updated for inflation to January 1, 2001. For 25rates effective July 1, 2001 only, rates shall be the greater 26of the rate computed for July 1, 2001 or the rate effective on   SB1690- 16 -LRB104 10113 KTG 20185 b1June 30, 2001. 2    Notwithstanding any other provision of this Section, for 3facilities licensed by the Department of Public Health under 4the Nursing Home Care Act as skilled nursing facilities or 5intermediate care facilities, the Illinois Department shall 6determine by rule the rates taking effect on July 1, 2002, 7which shall be 5.9% less than the rates in effect on June 30, 82002. 9    Notwithstanding any other provision of this Section, for 10facilities licensed by the Department of Public Health under 11the Nursing Home Care Act as skilled nursing facilities or 12intermediate care facilities, if the payment methodologies 13required under Section 5A-12 and the waiver granted under 42 14CFR 433.68 are approved by the United States Centers for 15Medicare and Medicaid Services, the rates taking effect on 16July 1, 2004 shall be 3.0% greater than the rates in effect on 17June 30, 2004. These rates shall take effect only upon 18approval and implementation of the payment methodologies 19required under Section 5A-12. 20    Notwithstanding any other provisions of this Section, for 21facilities licensed by the Department of Public Health under 22the Nursing Home Care Act as skilled nursing facilities or 23intermediate care facilities, the rates taking effect on 24January 1, 2005 shall be 3% more than the rates in effect on 25December 31, 2004. 26    Notwithstanding any other provision of this Section, for   SB1690- 17 -LRB104 10113 KTG 20185 b1facilities licensed by the Department of Public Health under 2the Nursing Home Care Act as skilled nursing facilities or 3intermediate care facilities, effective January 1, 2009, the 4per diem support component of the rates effective on January 51, 2008, computed using the most recent cost reports on file 6with the Department of Healthcare and Family Services no later 7than April 1, 2005, updated for inflation to January 1, 2006, 8shall be increased to the amount that would have been derived 9using standard Department of Healthcare and Family Services 10methods, procedures, and inflators. 11    Notwithstanding any other provisions of this Section, for 12facilities licensed by the Department of Public Health under 13the Nursing Home Care Act as intermediate care facilities that 14are federally defined as Institutions for Mental Disease, or 15facilities licensed by the Department of Public Health under 16the Specialized Mental Health Rehabilitation Act of 2013, a 17socio-development component rate equal to 6.6% of the 18facility's nursing component rate as of January 1, 2006 shall 19be established and paid effective July 1, 2006. The 20socio-development component of the rate shall be increased by 21a factor of 2.53 on the first day of the month that begins at 22least 45 days after January 11, 2008 (the effective date of 23Public Act 95-707). As of August 1, 2008, the 24socio-development component rate shall be equal to 6.6% of the 25facility's nursing component rate as of January 1, 2006, 26multiplied by a factor of 3.53. For services provided on or   SB1690- 18 -LRB104 10113 KTG 20185 b1after April 1, 2011, or the first day of the month that begins 2at least 45 days after February 16, 2011 (the effective date of 3Public Act 96-1530), whichever is later, the Illinois 4Department may by rule adjust these socio-development 5component rates, and may use different adjustment 6methodologies for those facilities participating, and those 7not participating, in the Illinois Department's demonstration 8program pursuant to the provisions of Title 77, Part 300, 9Subpart T of the Illinois Administrative Code, but in no case 10may such rates be diminished below those in effect on August 1, 112008. 12    For facilities licensed by the Department of Public Health 13under the Nursing Home Care Act as Intermediate Care for the 14Developmentally Disabled facilities or as long-term care 15facilities for residents under 22 years of age, the rates 16taking effect on July 1, 2003 shall include a statewide 17increase of 4%, as defined by the Department. 18    For facilities licensed by the Department of Public Health 19under the Nursing Home Care Act as Intermediate Care for the 20Developmentally Disabled facilities or Long Term Care for 21Under Age 22 facilities, the rates taking effect on the first 22day of the month that begins at least 45 days after January 11, 232008 (the effective date of Public Act 95-707) shall include a 24statewide increase of 2.5%, as defined by the Department. 25    Notwithstanding any other provision of this Section, for 26facilities licensed by the Department of Public Health under   SB1690- 19 -LRB104 10113 KTG 20185 b1the Nursing Home Care Act as skilled nursing facilities or 2intermediate care facilities, effective January 1, 2005, 3facility rates shall be increased by the difference between 4(i) a facility's per diem property, liability, and malpractice 5insurance costs as reported in the cost report filed with the 6Department of Public Aid and used to establish rates effective 7July 1, 2001 and (ii) those same costs as reported in the 8facility's 2002 cost report. These costs shall be passed 9through to the facility without caps or limitations, except 10for adjustments required under normal auditing procedures. 11    Rates established effective each July 1 shall govern 12payment for services rendered throughout that fiscal year, 13except that rates established on July 1, 1996 shall be 14increased by 6.8% for services provided on or after January 1, 151997. Such rates will be based upon the rates calculated for 16the year beginning July 1, 1990, and for subsequent years 17thereafter until June 30, 2001 shall be based on the facility 18cost reports for the facility fiscal year ending at any point 19in time during the previous calendar year, updated to the 20midpoint of the rate year. The cost report shall be on file 21with the Department no later than April 1 of the current rate 22year. Should the cost report not be on file by April 1, the 23Department shall base the rate on the latest cost report filed 24by each skilled care facility and intermediate care facility, 25updated to the midpoint of the current rate year. In 26determining rates for services rendered on and after July 1,   SB1690- 20 -LRB104 10113 KTG 20185 b11985, fixed time shall not be computed at less than zero. The 2Department shall not make any alterations of regulations which 3would reduce any component of the Medicaid rate to a level 4below what that component would have been utilizing in the 5rate effective on July 1, 1984. 6    (2) Shall take into account the actual costs incurred by 7facilities in providing services for recipients of skilled 8nursing and intermediate care services under the medical 9assistance program. 10    (3) Shall take into account the medical and psycho-social 11characteristics and needs of the patients. 12    (4) Shall take into account the actual costs incurred by 13facilities in meeting licensing and certification standards 14imposed and prescribed by the State of Illinois, any of its 15political subdivisions or municipalities and by the U.S. 16Department of Health and Human Services pursuant to Title XIX 17of the Social Security Act. 18    The Department of Healthcare and Family Services shall 19develop precise standards for payments to reimburse nursing 20facilities for any utilization of appropriate rehabilitative 21personnel for the provision of rehabilitative services which 22is authorized by federal regulations, including reimbursement 23for services provided by qualified therapists or qualified 24assistants, and which is in accordance with accepted 25professional practices. Reimbursement also may be made for 26utilization of other supportive personnel under appropriate   SB1690- 21 -LRB104 10113 KTG 20185 b1supervision. 2    The Department shall develop enhanced payments to offset 3the additional costs incurred by a facility serving 4exceptional need residents and shall allocate at least 5$4,000,000 of the funds collected from the assessment 6established by Section 5B-2 of this Code for such payments. 7For the purpose of this Section, "exceptional needs" means, 8but need not be limited to, ventilator care and traumatic 9brain injury care. The enhanced payments for exceptional need 10residents under this paragraph are not due and payable, 11however, until (i) the methodologies described in this 12paragraph are approved by the federal government in an 13appropriate State Plan amendment and (ii) the assessment 14imposed by Section 5B-2 of this Code is determined to be a 15permissible tax under Title XIX of the Social Security Act.16    Beginning January 1, 2014 the methodologies for 17reimbursement of nursing facility services as provided under 18this Section 5-5.4 shall no longer be applicable for services 19provided on or after January 1, 2014. 20    No payment increase under this Section for the MDS 21methodology, exceptional care residents, or the 22socio-development component rate established by Public Act 2396-1530 of the 96th General Assembly and funded by the 24assessment imposed under Section 5B-2 of this Code shall be 25due and payable until after the Department notifies the 26long-term care providers, in writing, that the payment   SB1690- 22 -LRB104 10113 KTG 20185 b1methodologies to long-term care providers required under this 2Section have been approved by the Centers for Medicare and 3Medicaid Services of the U.S. Department of Health and Human 4Services and the waivers under 42 CFR 433.68 for the 5assessment imposed by this Section, if necessary, have been 6granted by the Centers for Medicare and Medicaid Services of 7the U.S. Department of Health and Human Services. Upon 8notification to the Department of approval of the payment 9methodologies required under this Section and the waivers 10granted under 42 CFR 433.68, all increased payments otherwise 11due under this Section prior to the date of notification shall 12be due and payable within 90 days of the date federal approval 13is received. 14    On and after July 1, 2012, the Department shall reduce any 15rate of reimbursement for services or other payments or alter 16any methodologies authorized by this Code to reduce any rate 17of reimbursement for services or other payments in accordance 18with Section 5-5e. 19    For facilities licensed by the Department of Public Health 20under the ID/DD Community Care Act as ID/DD Facilities and 21under the MC/DD Act as MC/DD Facilities, subject to federal 22approval, the rates taking effect for services delivered on or 23after August 1, 2019 shall be increased by 3.5% over the rates 24in effect on June 30, 2019. The Department shall adopt rules, 25including emergency rules under subsection (ii) of Section 265-45 of the Illinois Administrative Procedure Act, to   SB1690- 23 -LRB104 10113 KTG 20185 b1implement the provisions of this Section, including wage 2increases for direct care staff. 3    For facilities licensed by the Department of Public Health 4under the ID/DD Community Care Act as ID/DD Facilities and 5under the MC/DD Act as MC/DD Facilities, subject to federal 6approval, the rates taking effect on the latter of the 7approval date of the State Plan Amendment for these facilities 8or the Waiver Amendment for the home and community-based 9services settings shall include an increase sufficient to 10provide a $0.26 per hour wage increase to the base wage for 11non-executive staff. The Department shall adopt rules, 12including emergency rules as authorized by Section 5-45 of the 13Illinois Administrative Procedure Act, to implement the 14provisions of this Section, including wage increases for 15direct care staff. 16    For facilities licensed by the Department of Public Health 17under the ID/DD Community Care Act as ID/DD Facilities and 18under the MC/DD Act as MC/DD Facilities, subject to federal 19approval of the State Plan Amendment and the Waiver Amendment 20for the home and community-based services settings, the rates 21taking effect for the services delivered on or after July 1, 222020 shall include an increase sufficient to provide a $1.00 23per hour wage increase for non-executive staff. For services 24delivered on or after January 1, 2021, subject to federal 25approval of the State Plan Amendment and the Waiver Amendment 26for the home and community-based services settings, shall   SB1690- 24 -LRB104 10113 KTG 20185 b1include an increase sufficient to provide a $0.50 per hour 2increase for non-executive staff. The Department shall adopt 3rules, including emergency rules as authorized by Section 5-45 4of the Illinois Administrative Procedure Act, to implement the 5provisions of this Section, including wage increases for 6direct care staff. 7    For facilities licensed by the Department of Public Health 8under the ID/DD Community Care Act as ID/DD Facilities and 9under the MC/DD Act as MC/DD Facilities, subject to federal 10approval of the State Plan Amendment, the rates taking effect 11for the residential services delivered on or after July 1, 122021, shall include an increase sufficient to provide a $0.50 13per hour increase for aides in the rate methodology. For 14facilities licensed by the Department of Public Health under 15the ID/DD Community Care Act as ID/DD Facilities and under the 16MC/DD Act as MC/DD Facilities, subject to federal approval of 17the State Plan Amendment, the rates taking effect for the 18residential services delivered on or after January 1, 2022 19shall include an increase sufficient to provide a $1.00 per 20hour increase for aides in the rate methodology. In addition, 21for residential services delivered on or after January 1, 2022 22such rates shall include an increase sufficient to provide 23wages for all residential non-executive direct care staff, 24excluding aides, at the federal Department of Labor, Bureau of 25Labor Statistics' average wage as defined in rule by the 26Department. The Department shall adopt rules, including   SB1690- 25 -LRB104 10113 KTG 20185 b1emergency rules as authorized by Section 5-45 of the Illinois 2Administrative Procedure Act, to implement the provisions of 3this Section. 4    For facilities licensed by the Department of Public Health 5under the ID/DD Community Care Act as ID/DD facilities and 6under the MC/DD Act as MC/DD facilities, subject to federal 7approval of the State Plan Amendment, the rates taking effect 8for services delivered on or after January 1, 2023, shall 9include a $1.00 per hour wage increase for all direct support 10personnel and all other frontline personnel who are not 11subject to the Bureau of Labor Statistics' average wage 12increases, who work in residential and community day services 13settings, with at least $0.50 of those funds to be provided as 14a direct increase to all aide base wages, with the remaining 15$0.50 to be used flexibly for base wage increases to the rate 16methodology for aides. In addition, for residential services 17delivered on or after January 1, 2023 the rates shall include 18an increase sufficient to provide wages for all residential 19non-executive direct care staff, excluding aides, at the 20federal Department of Labor, Bureau of Labor Statistics' 21average wage as determined by the Department. Also, for 22services delivered on or after January 1, 2023, the rates will 23include adjustments to employment-related expenses as defined 24in rule by the Department. The Department shall adopt rules, 25including emergency rules as authorized by Section 5-45 of the 26Illinois Administrative Procedure Act, to implement the   SB1690- 26 -LRB104 10113 KTG 20185 b1provisions of this Section. 2    For facilities licensed by the Department of Public Health 3under the ID/DD Community Care Act as ID/DD facilities and 4under the MC/DD Act as MC/DD facilities, subject to federal 5approval of the State Plan Amendment, the rates taking effect 6for services delivered on or after January 1, 2024 shall 7include a $2.50 per hour wage increase for all direct support 8personnel and all other frontline personnel who are not 9subject to the Bureau of Labor Statistics' average wage 10increases and who work in residential and community day 11services settings. At least $1.25 of the per hour wage 12increase shall be provided as a direct increase to all aide 13base wages, and the remaining $1.25 of the per hour wage 14increase shall be used flexibly for base wage increases to the 15rate methodology for aides. In addition, for residential 16services delivered on or after January 1, 2024, the rates 17shall include an increase sufficient to provide wages for all 18residential non-executive direct care staff, excluding aides, 19at the federal Department of Labor, Bureau of Labor 20Statistics' average wage as determined by the Department. 21Also, for services delivered on or after January 1, 2024, the 22rates will include adjustments to employment-related expenses 23as defined in rule by the Department. The Department shall 24adopt rules, including emergency rules as authorized by 25Section 5-45 of the Illinois Administrative Procedure Act, to 26implement the provisions of this Section.   SB1690- 27 -LRB104 10113 KTG 20185 b1    For facilities licensed by the Department of Public Health 2under the ID/DD Community Care Act as ID/DD facilities and 3under the MC/DD Act as MC/DD facilities, subject to federal 4approval of a State Plan Amendment, the rates taking effect 5for services delivered on or after January 1, 2025 shall 6include a $1.00 per hour wage increase for all direct support 7personnel and all other frontline personnel who are not 8subject to the Bureau of Labor Statistics' average wage 9increases and who work in residential and community day 10services settings, with at least $0.75 of those funds to be 11provided as a direct increase to all aide base wages and the 12remaining $0.25 to be used flexibly for base wage increases to 13the rate methodology for aides. These increases shall not be 14used by facilities for operational and administrative 15expenses. In addition, for residential services delivered on 16or after January 1, 2025, the rates shall include an increase 17sufficient to provide wages for all residential non-executive 18direct care staff, excluding aides, at the federal Department 19of Labor, Bureau of Labor Statistics' average wage as 20determined by the Department. Also, for services delivered on 21or after January 1, 2025, the rates will include adjustments 22to employment-related expenses as defined in rule by the 23Department. The Department shall adopt rules, including 24emergency rules as authorized by Section 5-45 of the Illinois 25Administrative Procedure Act, to implement the provisions of 26this Section.   SB1690- 28 -LRB104 10113 KTG 20185 b1    Notwithstanding any other provision of this Section to the 2contrary, any regional wage adjuster for facilities located 3outside of the counties of Cook, DuPage, Kane, Lake, McHenry, 4and Will shall be no lower than 1.00, and any regional wage 5adjuster for facilities located within the counties of Cook, 6DuPage, Kane, Lake, McHenry, and Will shall be no lower than 71.15. 8    For facilities licensed by the Department of Public Health 9under the ID/DD Community Care Act as ID/DD facilities and 10under the MC/DD Act as MC/DD facilities, no later than January 111, 2026, the Department of Healthcare and Family Services must 12submit a Title XIX State Plan amendment to the federal Centers 13for Medicare and Medicaid Services that shall include an 14increase in the rate methodology sufficient to provide for a 15wage rate of 150% of the statewide, regional, or local minimum 16wage for services delivered on or after January 1, 2026, for 17all direct support personnel and all other frontline personnel 18who are not subject to the Bureau of Labor Statistics' average 19wage increases and who work in residential and community day 20services settings. The State Plan amendment shall also include 21an increase in the rate methodology sufficient to provide wage 22increases for all residential non-executive direct care staff, 23excluding direct support personnel, at the federal Department 24of Labor, Bureau of Labor Statistics' average wage as defined 25by rule by the Department for services delivered on or after 26January 1, 2026. For services delivered on or after January 1,   SB1690- 29 -LRB104 10113 KTG 20185 b12026, the rates shall include adjustments to 2employment-related expenses as defined by rule by the 3Department. 4(Source: P.A. 102-16, eff. 6-17-21; 102-699, eff. 4-19-22; 5103-8, eff. 6-7-23; 103-588, eff. 7-1-24.) 6    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect upon 7becoming law.